Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1464
Consumer care; nonperformance; dealer provide notice, when.

A dealer shall notify the warrantor as soon as reasonably possible, verbally or in writing, if the dealer is unable or unwilling to perform material or repetitive consumer care.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 23.
October 1, 2026